Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ALS RESEARCH.new text end new text begin (a) Of the amount appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education pursuant to Laws 2022, chapter 42, section 2, paragraph (b), as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 124, article 1, section 1, and Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 34, section 1, $15,000,000 is canceled. new text end new text begin (b) $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for a collaborative partnership with the Mayo Clinic to engage in ongoing research into amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), with the goal of bettering the lives of individuals with ALS and finding a cure for the disease. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, unencumbered balances under this section do not cancel until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (c) Beginning January 15, 2026, and annually thereafter until January 15, 2030, or until the funds are fully expended, whichever occurs first, the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota must submit a report to the legislature specifying how funds appropriated under this section have been used by the collaborative partnership. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2022, chapter 42, section 2, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 124, article 1, section 1, Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 34, section 1, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: 25-05066 Laws 2022, chapter 42, section 2, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 124, article 1, section 1; as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 34, section 1 Section 1. Laws 2022, chapter 42, section 2, is amended to read: Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION; ALS RESEARCH. (a) $396,000 in fiscal year 2023 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education to award competitive grants to applicants for research into amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS). The commissioner may work with the Minnesota Department of Health to administer the grant program, including identifying clinical and translational research and innovations, developing outcomes and objectives with the goal of bettering the lives of individuals with ALS and finding a cure for the disease, and application review and grant recipient selection. Not more than $396,000 may be used by the commissioner to administer the grant program. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, unencumbered balances under this section do not cancel until June 30, 2026. (b) $19,604,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education to award competitive grants to applicants for research into amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS). The commissioner may work with the Minnesota Department of Health to administer the grant program, including identifying clinical and translational research and innovations, developing outcomes and objectives with the goal of bettering the lives of individuals with ALS and finding a cure for the disease, and application review and grant recipient selection. Up to $15,000,000 may be used by the commissioner for grants to the Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Association, Never Surrender, or other similar organizations to award and administer competitive grants to applicants for research into ALS under this section. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, unencumbered balances under this section do not cancel until June 30, 2029. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner, the Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Association, Never Surrender, and other similar organizations may use up to a total of five percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. (c) Grants shall be awarded to support clinical and translational research related to ALS. Research topics may include but are not limited to environmental factors, disease mechanisms, disease models, biomarkers, drug development, clinical studies, precision medicine, medical devices, assistive technology, and cognitive studies. (d) Eligible applicants for the grants are research facilities, universities, and health systems located in Minnesota. Applicants must submit proposals to the commissioner in the time, form, and manner established by the commissioner. Applicants may coordinate research endeavors and submit a joint application. When reviewing the proposals, the commissioner shall make an effort to avoid approving a grant for an applicant whose research is duplicative of an existing grantee's research. (e) Beginning January 15, 2023, and annually thereafter until January 15, 2030, the commissioner shall submit a report to the legislature specifying the applicants receiving grants under this section, the amount of each grant, the purposes for which the grant funds were used, and the amount of the appropriation that is unexpended. The report must also include relevant findings, results, and outcomes of the grant program, and any other information which the commissioner deems significant or useful. EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective the day following final enactment.